Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. Coal
§ 39-14-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. The following shall apply:

The taxpayer may request a value determination from the department and propose a value determination method which may be used until the department issues a value determination. The taxpayer shall submit all available data relevant to its proposal and any additional information the department deems necessary. After the department issues its determination, the taxpayer shall make adjustments based upon the value established or request a hearing by the board;

A taxpayer may request and the department shall provide written interpretations of these statutes and rules. When requesting an interpretation, a taxpayer must set forth the facts and circumstances pertinent to the issue. If the department deems the facts and circumstances provided to be insufficient, it may request additional information. A taxpayer may act in reliance upon a written interpretation through the end of the calendar year in which the interpretation was issued, or until revoked by the department, whichever occurs last if the pertinent facts and circumstances were substantially correct and fully disclosed.

Appeals. The following shall apply:

Following determination of the fair market value of property the department shall notify the taxpayer by mail of the assessed value. The person assessed may file written objections to the assessment with the board within thirty (30) days of the date of postmark and appear before the board at a time specified by the board. The person assessed shall also file a copy of the written objections with the county treasurer of the county in which the property is located, who shall notify the county assessor and the board of county commissioners, with an estimate of the tax amount under appeal based upon the previous year’s tax levy;

Mine product valuation amendments under this section may be appealed by the taxpayer to the board within thirty (30) days of the final administrative decision;

Any taxpayer who feels aggrieved by the valuation and taxes levied by this article may appeal to the board. The appeal does not relieve the taxpayer from paying the tax when due and payable nor does the payment invalidate the appeal. No restraining order or injunction shall be granted or issued by any court or judge to restrain or enjoin the collection of any tax, interest or penalty imposed by this article;

The state board of equalization shall perform the duties specified in article 15, section 10 of the Wyoming constitution and shall hear appeals from county boards of equalization and review final decisions of the department upon application of any interested person adversely affected, including boards of county commissioners for the purposes of this paragraph, under the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Any interested person adversely affected by the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule pursuant to W.S. 16-3-103(a) shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing before the board;

Any person including the state of Wyoming aggrieved by any order issued by the board, or any county board of equalization whose decision has been reversed or modified by the state board of equalization, may appeal the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the property or some part thereof is situated.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

If a taxpayer has reason to believe that ad valorem taxes imposed by this article have been overpaid, a request for refund shall be filed with the department by submitting amended returns within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-107(a)(i). Any refund granted shall be subject to modification or revocation upon audit;

If a taxpayer has reason to believe that taxes imposed by this article have been overpaid, a request for refund shall be filed with the department by submitting an amended return within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-107(a)(i). Refunds of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or less may be applied to subsequent payments for taxes imposed by this article. Requests for refunds exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) shall be approved in writing by the department prior to the taxpayer receiving credit. All refunds granted are subject to modification or revocation upon audit;

Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, the taxpayer is entitled to receive a refund of any overpaid ad valorem or severance tax identified by an audit regardless of whether a refund has been requested.

Credits. The following shall apply:

Any refund may, at the discretion of the board of county commissioners, be made in the form of credit against future tax payments for a period not to exceed five (5) years. Unless otherwise agreed to by the taxpayer, refunds in the form of credit against future tax payments shall be made in no less than equal annual amounts. The board of county commissioners shall not provide a credit for interest on the excess tax paid unless the taxes are paid under protest due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization and the taxpayer prevails in the appeal;

The taxpayer is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid gross product or severance tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds;

If a taxpayer overpaid taxes imposed by this article, the department shall allow a credit in the amount of the overpayment to be taken on the taxpayer’s subsequent monthly reports for the production year.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

Escrow. The following shall apply:

If ad valorem taxes are paid under protest to the extent of and due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization or any court of competent jurisdiction, the county treasurer shall deposit that protested amount under appeal in an interest bearing escrow account and withhold distribution until a final decision on the appeal has been rendered. To the extent the taxpayer prevails in the appeal, the county treasurer shall refund that amount under appeal, plus interest earned thereon, to the taxpayer within thirty (30) days from the day the final decision is rendered. If the taxpayer pays to the county an amount in excess of the protested amount under appeal, the excess shall be distributed as provided by law;

If severance taxes are paid under protest to the extent of and due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization or any court of competent jurisdiction, the department shall deposit that protested amount under appeal in a separate interest bearing escrow account and withhold distribution until a final decision on the appeal has been rendered by the state board of equalization or the court. To the extent the taxpayer prevails in the appeal, the department shall refund that amount under appeal, plus interest earned thereon, to the taxpayer within thirty (30) days from the day the final decision is rendered. If the taxpayer pays to the state an amount in excess of the protested amount under appeal, the excess shall be distributed as provided by law;

This provision does not enlarge or curtail the ability of a taxpayer to appeal any department of revenue decision as otherwise provided for under this act.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2009, ch. 150, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment

rewrote (c)(i), which read: “If any person pays any tax, or portion thereof, found to have been erroneous or illegal, the board of county commissioners shall direct the county treasurer to refund the erroneous or illegal payment to the taxpayer. When an increase in the value of any product is subject to the approval of any agency of the United States of America or the state of Wyoming, or of any court, the increased value shall be subject to property taxation. In the event the increase in value is disapproved, either in whole or in part, then the amount of tax which has been paid on the disapproved part of the value shall be considered excess tax. Within one (1) year following the final determination of value, any person who has paid any such excess tax may apply for a refund, and the board of county commissioners shall refund the amount of excess tax paid”; substituted “by submitting an amended return within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-107(a)(i)” for “on forms it prescribes prior to the end of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year which included the month for which overpayment was made” in the first sentence of (c)(ii); added (c)(iii); and deleted “period” following “scope of the audit” in (d)(ii), and made related changes.

Laws 2009, ch. 150, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 5, 2009.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (f)(ii), substituted “department” for “state treasurer” twice.

Timeliness of refund request. —

Coal mine was not required to appeal the final valuation applied to its coal sales within 30 days in order to later request a refund based on amended production reports. Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002).

Amounts paid under protest. —

Proper determination of amount of taxes paid under protest was the difference between taxpayer's objective calculation of its tax obligation and the tax which was levied, and amount was not controlled by county treasurer's previous estimate. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Bowen, 979 P.2d 503,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1999) (decided under prior law).

§ 39-14-110.
Statute of limitations.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, there is no general statute of limitations for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-111.
Distribution.

As provided by W.S. 39-14-104(a), the total severance tax rate for surface coal shall be six and one-half percent (6.5%). As provided by W.S. 39-14-104(b), the total severance tax rate for underground coal shall be three and three-quarters percent (3.75%). A one and one-half percent (1.5%) tax imposed by W.S. 39-14-104(a)(i) and a one and one-half percent (1.5%) tax imposed by W.S. 39-14-104(b)(i) shall be deposited into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund. All other taxes imposed by W.S. 39-14-104(a) and (b) shall be deposited into the severance tax distribution account.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 62, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 16, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 97, § 4.

All payments received pursuant to W.S. 39-14-107(b)(iii) shall be transferred to an account. The monies in this account shall be invested or deposited in accordance with W.S.

9-4-714

through

9-4-831

, and any interest earned shall be credited to the general fund. The revenue under W.S. 39-14-107(b)(iii) shall be distributed in accordance with this section subject to the following:

Revenues earned during each fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that fiscal year for accounting purposes;

Revenues which are earned and received during the first three (3) calendar quarters of the fiscal year shall be distributed within the first fifteen (15) days of October, January and April. For the last quarter of each fiscal year, revenues earned or received shall be distributed not later than June 30. In computing distributions for the last quarter, the state treasurer shall use the most recent consensus revenue estimating group estimates to the extent that earnings cannot be determined by June 30. Not later than September 15, the state treasurer shall compute the actual earnings for the last quarter of the preceding fiscal year and make adjustments to the October distributions in an amount equal to the difference between revenues earned and actual distributions for the preceding fiscal year.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 209, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 97, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 62, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 108, § 2; ch. 108, § 2; 1999, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 139, § 1; 2000, ch. 97, §§ 2(b) and 4; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; ch. 209, § 2(b); 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2016 ch. 16, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “of the trust and agency fund” at the end of the first sentence in (g).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S.

9-4-714

” for “W.S.

9-4-701

” in the introductory language of (g).

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 16 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and except as otherwise provided by law for fiscal year 1994” at the end of (g).

The second
2016 amendment, by ch. 16 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (e), which read: “If the cumulative taxes levied against coal in this section do not exceed sixty cents ($.60) per ton of surface mined coal, or thirty cents ($.30) per ton of underground mined coal, the tax proceeds shall be distributed in the manner provided in this section. If the cumulative taxes in this section exceed sixty cents ($.60) per ton of surface mined coal, or thirty cents ($.30) per ton of underground mined coal, so that the limit imposed by
W.S. 39-14-105(b) becomes operative, an amount equal to one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the value of the gross product of coal extracted shall be deducted from the total tax proceeds for deposit in the permanent mineral trust fund and the remaining proceeds shall be distributed on a pro rata basis for the purposes specified in this section and any other applicable law.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “six and one-half percent (6.5%)” for “seven percent (7%)” in the first sentence of (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Laws 2022, ch. 102, § 3, provides, “This act shall apply to surface coal produced on or after the effective date of this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Constitutionality. —

The funding scheme enacted under a prior version of this section, whereby mineral severance tax revenues previously designated for the state highway fund were used to fund an underground storage tank program and were replaced in the highway fund with proceeds from an additional fuel tax, did not violate the requirement of art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., that any vehicle or gasoline tax be committed exclusively to public highway expenses. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

Underground storage tank funding scheme. —

An oil company's bare allegation that the state was funding an underground storage tank program by “fraudulently” transferring fuel tax proceeds required by art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., to be used for public highway expenses was insufficient to state a claim for fraud. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).